siciliano.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+NN +NN_P
+ADJ +ADJ_DIM +ADJ_IND +ADJ_IES +ADJ_NUM +ADJ_POS
+PRON +PRON_P +PRON_DIM +PRON_IND +PRON_IES +PRON_REL +PRON_POS +PRON_PER
+ADV +ART +INT +PREP +PREP_A +CONJ_C +CONJ_S
+V_ARI +V_IRI +V_FIN +V_NOFIN +V_PP
+MASC +FEMM
+SING +PLUR
+DIM +AUM +VEZA +VEZB +PEG +SUP
+INF +IND +SUBJ +COND +IMP +PART +GER
+PRES +IMPERF +PAST +FUT
+1 +2 +3
+GLI +VEL_A +VEL_Y
+C_CE +C_CI +C_GLI +C_LA +C_LE +C_LI +C_LO +C_ME +C_MI +C_NE +C_SE +C_SI +C_TE +C_TI +C_VE +C_VI

LEXICON SiriEssiri

! == conjugation paradigm for essiri (and alternate form siri) ==

    ! -- indicative
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:sugnu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:sì #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:è #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:semu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:siti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:sunnu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:era #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:eri #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:era #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:eramu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:èramu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:eravu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:eranu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:èranu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:erunu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:èrunu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:fui #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:fusti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:fu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:fomu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:fumu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:fustivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:fùstivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:foru #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:furu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:sarò #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:sarai #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:sarà #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:saremu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:sariti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:sarannu #;

    ! -- conditional
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:saria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:sarissi #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:saria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:sariamu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:sariavu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:sarianu #;

    ! -- imperative
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:sia #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:fussi #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:semu #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:siti #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:siati #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:fussiru #;

    ! -- subjunctive
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:sia #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:sia #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:sia #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:siamu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:siati #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:sianu #;

    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:fussi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:fussi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:fussi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:fussimu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:fussivu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:fussiru #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:fussinu #;

    ! -- nonfinals
    +V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:essennu #;
    !+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:essir SufClit;
    +V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:essiri #;

    ! -- participles
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING:stata #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+SING:statu #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR:state #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR:stati #;

LEXICON SufCommon1

    ! -- indicative
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*etti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*esi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*asti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*etti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*esi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*ettimu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*esimu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*astivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ettiru #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*esiru #;

    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING*arò #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING*arai #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING*arà #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*aremu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*ariti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*arannu #;

LEXICON Root
    l_essiri+V_IRI: SiriEssiri;
    l_siri+V_IRI: SiriEssiri;
    l_diri:d+V_IRI SufCommon1;
    l_stari:st+V_ARI SufCommon1;
